Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202618-3531
Special assessments; appeal to district court; adjustments.

Any person or any city or village aggrieved may appeal to the district court by filing a petition within twenty days after the final determination under section 18-3530. The court shall hear and determine the appeal in a summary manner as in equity, without a jury, and shall increase or reduce the special assessments as necessary to ensure that the special assessments are in the full amount of the special benefits and that the apportionment of benefits is equitable.

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 31.
April 17, 2026